tests/numerals/numerals.yaml
  "numbers in abl":
    1<num><subst><abl> : "1-дән"
    2<num><subst><abl> : "2-дән"
    3<num><subst><abl> : "3-тән"
    4<num><subst><abl> : "4-тән"
    5<num><subst><abl> : "5-тән"
    6<num><subst><abl> : "6-дан"
    7<num><subst><abl> : "7-дән"
    8<num><subst><abl> : "8-дән"
    9<num><subst><abl> : "9-дан"
    10<num><subst><abl> : "10-нан"
    11<num><subst><abl> : "11-дән"
    12<num><subst><abl> : "12-дән"
    13<num><subst><abl> : "13-тән"
    14<num><subst><abl> : "14-тән"
    15<num><subst><abl> : "15-тән"
    16<num><subst><abl> : "16-дан"
    17<num><subst><abl> : "17-дән"
    18<num><subst><abl> : "18-дән"
    19<num><subst><abl> : "19-дан"
    20<num><subst><abl> : "20-дан"
    21<num><subst><abl> : "21-дән"
    22<num><subst><abl> : "22-дән"
    23<num><subst><abl> : "23-тән"
    24<num><subst><abl> : "24-тән"
    25<num><subst><abl> : "25-тән"
    26<num><subst><abl> : "26-дан"
    27<num><subst><abl> : "27-дән"
    28<num><subst><abl> : "28-дән"
    29<num><subst><abl> : "29-дан"
    30<num><subst><abl> : "30-дан"
    31<num><subst><abl> : "31-дән"
    32<num><subst><abl> : "32-дән"
    33<num><subst><abl> : "33-тән"
    34<num><subst><abl> : "34-тән"
    35<num><subst><abl> : "35-тән"
    36<num><subst><abl> : "36-дан"
    37<num><subst><abl> : "37-дән"
    38<num><subst><abl> : "38-дән"
    39<num><subst><abl> : "39-дан"
    40<num><subst><abl> : "40-тан"
    41<num><subst><abl> : "41-дән"
    42<num><subst><abl> : "42-дән"
    43<num><subst><abl> : "43-тән"
    44<num><subst><abl> : "44-тән"
    45<num><subst><abl> : "45-тән"
    46<num><subst><abl> : "46-дан"
    47<num><subst><abl> : "47-дән"
    48<num><subst><abl> : "48-дән"
    49<num><subst><abl> : "49-дан"
    50<num><subst><abl> : "50-дән"
    51<num><subst><abl> : "51-дән"
    52<num><subst><abl> : "52-дән"
    53<num><subst><abl> : "53-тән"
    54<num><subst><abl> : "54-тән"
    55<num><subst><abl> : "55-тән"
    56<num><subst><abl> : "56-дан"
    57<num><subst><abl> : "57-дән"
    58<num><subst><abl> : "58-дән"
    59<num><subst><abl> : "59-дан"
    60<num><subst><abl> : "60-тан"
    61<num><subst><abl> : "61-дән"
    62<num><subst><abl> : "62-дән"
    63<num><subst><abl> : "63-тән"
    64<num><subst><abl> : "64-тән"
    65<num><subst><abl> : "65-тән"
    66<num><subst><abl> : "66-дан"
    67<num><subst><abl> : "67-дән"
    68<num><subst><abl> : "68-дән"
    69<num><subst><abl> : "69-дан"
    70<num><subst><abl> : "70-тән"
    71<num><subst><abl> : "71-дән"
    72<num><subst><abl> : "72-дән"
    73<num><subst><abl> : "73-тән"
    74<num><subst><abl> : "74-тән"
    75<num><subst><abl> : "75-тән"
    76<num><subst><abl> : "76-дан"
    77<num><subst><abl> : "77-дән"
    78<num><subst><abl> : "78-дән"
    79<num><subst><abl> : "79-дан"
    80<num><subst><abl> : "80-нән"
    81<num><subst><abl> : "81-дән"
    82<num><subst><abl> : "82-дән"
    83<num><subst><abl> : "83-тән"
    84<num><subst><abl> : "84-тән"
    85<num><subst><abl> : "85-тән"
    86<num><subst><abl> : "86-дан"
    87<num><subst><abl> : "87-дән"
    88<num><subst><abl> : "88-дән"
    89<num><subst><abl> : "89-дан"
    90<num><subst><abl> : "90-нан"
    91<num><subst><abl> : "91-дән"
    92<num><subst><abl> : "92-дән"
    93<num><subst><abl> : "93-тән"
    94<num><subst><abl> : "94-тән"
    95<num><subst><abl> : "95-тән"
    96<num><subst><abl> : "96-дан"
    97<num><subst><abl> : "97-дән"
    98<num><subst><abl> : "98-дән"
    99<num><subst><abl> : "99-дан"
    100<num><subst><abl> : "100-дән"

  "numbers in dat":
    1<num><subst><dat> : "1-гә"
    2<num><subst><dat> : "2-гә"
    3<num><subst><dat> : "3-кә"
    4<num><subst><dat> : "4-кә"
    5<num><subst><dat> : "5-кә"
    6<num><subst><dat> : "6-га"
    7<num><subst><dat> : "7-гә"
    8<num><subst><dat> : "8-гә"
    9<num><subst><dat> : "9-га"
    10<num><subst><dat> : "10-га"
    11<num><subst><dat> : "11-гә"
    12<num><subst><dat> : "12-гә"
    13<num><subst><dat> : "13-кә"
    14<num><subst><dat> : "14-кә"
    15<num><subst><dat> : "15-кә"
    16<num><subst><dat> : "16-га"
    17<num><subst><dat> : "17-гә"
    18<num><subst><dat> : "18-гә"
    19<num><subst><dat> : "19-га"
    20<num><subst><dat> : "20-га"
    21<num><subst><dat> : "21-гә"
    22<num><subst><dat> : "22-гә"
    23<num><subst><dat> : "23-кә"
    24<num><subst><dat> : "24-кә"
    25<num><subst><dat> : "25-кә"
    26<num><subst><dat> : "26-га"
    27<num><subst><dat> : "27-гә"
    28<num><subst><dat> : "28-гә"
    29<num><subst><dat> : "29-га"
    30<num><subst><dat> : "30-га"
    31<num><subst><dat> : "31-гә"
    32<num><subst><dat> : "32-гә"
    33<num><subst><dat> : "33-кә"
    34<num><subst><dat> : "34-кә"
    35<num><subst><dat> : "35-кә"
    36<num><subst><dat> : "36-га"
    37<num><subst><dat> : "37-гә"
    38<num><subst><dat> : "38-гә"
    39<num><subst><dat> : "39-га"
    40<num><subst><dat> : "40-ка"
    41<num><subst><dat> : "41-гә"
    42<num><subst><dat> : "42-гә"
    43<num><subst><dat> : "43-кә"
    44<num><subst><dat> : "44-кә"
    45<num><subst><dat> : "45-кә"
    46<num><subst><dat> : "46-га"
    47<num><subst><dat> : "47-гә"
    48<num><subst><dat> : "48-гә"
    49<num><subst><dat> : "49-га"
    50<num><subst><dat> : "50-гә"
    51<num><subst><dat> : "51-гә"
    52<num><subst><dat> : "52-гә"
    53<num><subst><dat> : "53-кә"
    54<num><subst><dat> : "54-кә"
    55<num><subst><dat> : "55-кә"
    56<num><subst><dat> : "56-га"
    57<num><subst><dat> : "57-гә"
    58<num><subst><dat> : "58-гә"
    59<num><subst><dat> : "59-га"
    60<num><subst><dat> : "60-ка"
    61<num><subst><dat> : "61-гә"
    62<num><subst><dat> : "62-гә"
    63<num><subst><dat> : "63-кә"
    64<num><subst><dat> : "64-кә"
    65<num><subst><dat> : "65-кә"
    66<num><subst><dat> : "66-га"
    67<num><subst><dat> : "67-гә"
    68<num><subst><dat> : "68-гә"
    69<num><subst><dat> : "69-га"
    70<num><subst><dat> : "70-кә"
    71<num><subst><dat> : "71-гә"
    72<num><subst><dat> : "72-гә"
    73<num><subst><dat> : "73-кә"
    74<num><subst><dat> : "74-кә"
    75<num><subst><dat> : "75-кә"
    76<num><subst><dat> : "76-га"
    77<num><subst><dat> : "77-гә"
    78<num><subst><dat> : "78-гә"
    79<num><subst><dat> : "79-га"
    80<num><subst><dat> : "80-гә"
    81<num><subst><dat> : "81-гә"
    82<num><subst><dat> : "82-гә"
    83<num><subst><dat> : "83-кә"
    84<num><subst><dat> : "84-кә"
    85<num><subst><dat> : "85-кә"
    86<num><subst><dat> : "86-га"
    87<num><subst><dat> : "87-гә"
    88<num><subst><dat> : "88-гә"
    89<num><subst><dat> : "89-га"
    90<num><subst><dat> : "90-га"
    91<num><subst><dat> : "91-гә"
    92<num><subst><dat> : "92-гә"
    93<num><subst><dat> : "93-кә"
    94<num><subst><dat> : "94-кә"
    95<num><subst><dat> : "95-кә"
    96<num><subst><dat> : "96-га"
    97<num><subst><dat> : "97-гә"
    98<num><subst><dat> : "98-гә"
    99<num><subst><dat> : "99-га"
    100<num><subst><dat> : "100-гә"



  "px numbers in nom":
    1<num><subst><px3sp><nom> : "1-е"
    2<num><subst><px3sp><nom> : "2-се"
    3<num><subst><px3sp><nom> : "3-е"
    4<num><subst><px3sp><nom> : "4-е"
    5<num><subst><px3sp><nom> : "5-е"
    6<num><subst><px3sp><nom> : "6-сы"
    7<num><subst><px3sp><nom> : "7-се"
    8<num><subst><px3sp><nom> : "8-е"
    9<num><subst><px3sp><nom> : "9-ы"
    10<num><subst><px3sp><nom> : "10-ы"
    11<num><subst><px3sp><nom> : "11-е"
    12<num><subst><px3sp><nom> : "12-се"
    13<num><subst><px3sp><nom> : "13-е"
    14<num><subst><px3sp><nom> : "14-е"
    15<num><subst><px3sp><nom> : "15-е"
    16<num><subst><px3sp><nom> : "16-сы"
    17<num><subst><px3sp><nom> : "17-се"
    18<num><subst><px3sp><nom> : "18-е"
    19<num><subst><px3sp><nom> : "19-ы"
    20<num><subst><px3sp><nom> : "20-сы"
    21<num><subst><px3sp><nom> : "21-е"
    22<num><subst><px3sp><nom> : "22-се"
    23<num><subst><px3sp><nom> : "23-е"
    24<num><subst><px3sp><nom> : "24-е"
    25<num><subst><px3sp><nom> : "25-е"
    26<num><subst><px3sp><nom> : "26-сы"
    27<num><subst><px3sp><nom> : "27-се"
    28<num><subst><px3sp><nom> : "28-е"
    29<num><subst><px3sp><nom> : "29-ы"
    30<num><subst><px3sp><nom> : "30-ы"
    31<num><subst><px3sp><nom> : "31-е"
    32<num><subst><px3sp><nom> : "32-се"
    33<num><subst><px3sp><nom> : "33-е"
    34<num><subst><px3sp><nom> : "34-е"
    35<num><subst><px3sp><nom> : "35-е"
    36<num><subst><px3sp><nom> : "36-сы"
    37<num><subst><px3sp><nom> : "37-се"
    38<num><subst><px3sp><nom> : "38-е"
    39<num><subst><px3sp><nom> : "39-ы"
    40<num><subst><px3sp><nom> : "40-ы"
    41<num><subst><px3sp><nom> : "41-е"
    42<num><subst><px3sp><nom> : "42-се"
    43<num><subst><px3sp><nom> : "43-е"
    44<num><subst><px3sp><nom> : "44-е"
    45<num><subst><px3sp><nom> : "45-е"
    46<num><subst><px3sp><nom> : "46-сы"
    47<num><subst><px3sp><nom> : "47-се"
    48<num><subst><px3sp><nom> : "48-е"
    49<num><subst><px3sp><nom> : "49-ы"
    50<num><subst><px3sp><nom> : "50-е"
    51<num><subst><px3sp><nom> : "51-е"
    52<num><subst><px3sp><nom> : "52-се"
    53<num><subst><px3sp><nom> : "53-е"
    54<num><subst><px3sp><nom> : "54-е"
    55<num><subst><px3sp><nom> : "55-е"
    56<num><subst><px3sp><nom> : "56-сы"
    57<num><subst><px3sp><nom> : "57-се"
    58<num><subst><px3sp><nom> : "58-е"
    59<num><subst><px3sp><nom> : "59-ы"
    60<num><subst><px3sp><nom> : "60-ы"
    61<num><subst><px3sp><nom> : "61-е"
    62<num><subst><px3sp><nom> : "62-се"
    63<num><subst><px3sp><nom> : "63-е"
    64<num><subst><px3sp><nom> : "64-е"
    65<num><subst><px3sp><nom> : "65-е"
    66<num><subst><px3sp><nom> : "66-сы"
    67<num><subst><px3sp><nom> : "67-се"
    68<num><subst><px3sp><nom> : "68-е"
    69<num><subst><px3sp><nom> : "69-ы"
    70<num><subst><px3sp><nom> : "70-е"
    71<num><subst><px3sp><nom> : "71-е"
    72<num><subst><px3sp><nom> : "72-се"
    73<num><subst><px3sp><nom> : "73-е"
    74<num><subst><px3sp><nom> : "74-е"
    75<num><subst><px3sp><nom> : "75-е"
    76<num><subst><px3sp><nom> : "76-сы"
    77<num><subst><px3sp><nom> : "77-се"
    78<num><subst><px3sp><nom> : "78-е"
    79<num><subst><px3sp><nom> : "79-ы"
    80<num><subst><px3sp><nom> : "80-е"
    81<num><subst><px3sp><nom> : "81-е"
    82<num><subst><px3sp><nom> : "82-се"
    83<num><subst><px3sp><nom> : "83-е"
    84<num><subst><px3sp><nom> : "84-е"
    85<num><subst><px3sp><nom> : "85-е"
    86<num><subst><px3sp><nom> : "86-сы"
    87<num><subst><px3sp><nom> : "87-се"
    88<num><subst><px3sp><nom> : "88-е"
    89<num><subst><px3sp><nom> : "89-ы"
    90<num><subst><px3sp><nom> : "90-ы"
    91<num><subst><px3sp><nom> : "91-е"
    92<num><subst><px3sp><nom> : "92-се"
    93<num><subst><px3sp><nom> : "93-е"
    94<num><subst><px3sp><nom> : "94-е"
    95<num><subst><px3sp><nom> : "95-е"
    96<num><subst><px3sp><nom> : "96-сы"
    97<num><subst><px3sp><nom> : "97-се"
    98<num><subst><px3sp><nom> : "98-е"
    99<num><subst><px3sp><nom> : "99-ы"
    100<num><subst><px3sp><nom> : "100-е"
